Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 41.
ELECTION OF COUNTY CLERK.

Election of county clerk.

The provisions for the election of a county clerk upon a population basis are hereby abolished and there may be elected a county clerk in like manner as a circuit clerk for the term of four (4) years, and in such cases, the County Clerk may be ex officio clerk of the probate court of such county until otherwise provided by the General Assembly. [As amended by Const. Amend. 95.]

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by H.J.R. No. 3 (see Acts 1951, p. 970) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on March 20, 1951. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 4, 1952, by a vote of 178,278 for and 123,245 against.

The amendment contained a preliminary paragraph which read “That the Constitution of the State of Arkansas be amended modifying Section 19 of Article 7 and Section 3 of Amendment No. 24 of said Constitution, so as to provide for the election of a County Clerk in all of the said counties of the State, as follow: ….”

Amendment 80 to the Arkansas Constitution, effective July 1, 2001, established circuit courts as the trial courts of original jurisdiction of all justiciable matters not otherwise assigned pursuant to the Constitution and specifically provided that “jurisdiction conferred on Circuit Courts established by this Amendment includes all matter previously cognizable by Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts…”.

Ark. Const. Amend. 95, which amended this amendment effective January 1, 2017, was proposed by H.J.R. 1027 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2016 general election by a vote of 747,856 for and 317,093 against. The amendment inserted “for the term of four (4) years” and made stylistic changes.

Amend. 95, § 8(b) and (c), provided:

“(b)

Persons elected to the following offices at the 2016 general election shall serve terms of two (2) years:

“(1)

County judge;

“(2)

Sheriff;

“(3)

Circuit clerk;

“(4)

County clerk;

“(5)

Assessor;

“(6)

Coroner;

“(7)

Treasurer;

“(8)

County surveyor; and

“(9)

Collector of taxes.

“(c)

Persons elected to the following offices at the 2018 general election shall serve terms of four (4) years:

“(1)

County judge;

“(2)

Sheriff;

“(3)

Circuit clerk;

“(4)

County clerk;

“(5)

Assessor;

“(6)

Coroner;

“(7)

Treasurer;

“(8)

County surveyor; and

“(9)

Collector of taxes.”

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 41, last paragraph: effective on adoption.